Utah statutes.
61-2b-33.   Penalty for violating this chapter -- Automatic revocation.

(1)  In addition to being subject to a disciplinary action by the board, a person required to be licensed, certified, or registered under this chapter who violates this chapter:

(a)  is guilty of a class A misdemeanor, upon a conviction of a first violation of this chapter; and

(b)  is guilty of a third degree felony, upon conviction of a second or subsequent violation of this chapter.

(2)  A license, certification, or registration issued by the division to a person convicted of a violation of Section 76-6-1203 is automatically revoked.

